Maryland, session 2026, HB0249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
12–402.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0249*

HOUSE BILL 249
It is the policy of this State to promote and encourage the fullest possible use of its
highway system by authorizing vehicle reciprocal or proportional registration agreements,
arrangements, and declarations with other jurisdictions as to vehicles registered in this
State and in those other jurisdictions, thus contributing to the SAFETY AND economic and
social development and growth of this State.
12–411.1.
(A) THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY MAKE AN AGREEMENT, AN ARRANGEMENT,
OR A DECLARATION WITH THE AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF ANY OTHER
JURISDICTION TO PROVIDE FOR RECIPROCAL ENFORCEMENT OF VIOLATIONS
RECORDED BY TRAFFIC CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEMS AND SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEMS BETWEEN THIS STATE AND THE OTHER JURISDICTION.
(B) AN AGREEMENT, AN ARRANGEMENT, OR A DECLARATION MADE UNDER
THIS SECTION MAY AUTHORIZE THE ADMINISTRATION TO REFUSE TO REGISTER OR
REREGISTER A MOTOR VEHICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.